Hawaii statutes.
[§11-326] Termination of candidate
committee's or noncandidate committee's registration. A candidate
committee or noncandidate committee may terminate its registration if:

(1) The candidate committee or noncandidate committee:

(A) Files a request for registration
termination form;

(B) Files a report disclosing contributions
and expenditures not previously reported by the committee, and the committee
has no surplus or deficit; and

(C) Mails or delivers to the commission a
copy of the committee's closing bank statement; and

(2) The request is approved by the commission. [L
2010, c 211, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next